New York, session 2025-2026, S9609.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3638 of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 8 to read as follows: 3 8. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 4 requirements of subdivisions two and three of this section shall not 5 apply to any school district located wholly or partially within a ten- 6 mile plume exposure pathway emergency planning zone surrounding a nucle- 7 ar power facility. 8 (b) Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit a school district from 9 voluntarily purchasing, leasing, or operating zero-emission school 10 buses. 11 (c) The commissioner shall publish and maintain a list of school 12 districts that qualify for exemption under this subdivision. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15361-01-6